Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2592.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2 of the act of October 24, 2018 (P.L.719, No.112), known as the Patient Test Result Information Act, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth.* * *"Prostate-specific antigen test." A blood test that measures 12345678910111213141516171819 the amount of prostate-specific antigen in an individual's blood, which may indicate that an individual is at an increased risk of prostate cancer.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 3.1. Prostate-specific antigen test results.(a) Notice.--When, in the judgment of the entity performing a prostate-specific antigen test, an abnormal level of prostate-specific antigen may exist, the entity performing the prostate-specific antigen test shall directly notify the patient or the patient's designee by providing notice that the entity has completed a review of the test performed on the patient and has sent results to the health care practitioner who ordered the prostate-specific antigen test. The notice shall include all of the following:(1) The name of the ordering health care practitioner.(2) The date the test was performed.(3) The date the results were sent to the ordering health care practitioner.(4) A summary of the results of the prostate-specific antigen test in lay language.(5) The following statements:You are receiving this notice as a result of a determination by your prostate-specific antigen test that further discussions of your test results are warranted and would be beneficial to you.The complete results of your test or tests have been or will be sent to the health care practitioner that ordered the test or tests. It is recommended that you contact your health care practitioner to discuss your 20260HB2592PN3501 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 results as soon as possible.(6) The contact information necessary for the patient to obtain a full report.(b) Time.--No later than five days after the date the results are sent to the ordering health care practitioner under subsection (a)(3), the entity performing the prostate-specific antigen test shall provide the patient or patient's designee with the notice under subsection (a).(c) Method of transmittal.--(1) The notice under subsection (a) shall be provided in a manner deemed acceptable by the patient or the patient's designee.(2) The notice provided under subsection (a) shall be presumed to comply with this act if:(i) mailed in a properly addressed and stamped letter through the United States Postal Service;(ii) sent electronically by email;(iii) sent by automatic alert from an electronic medical record system that the notice under subsection (a) has been posted to the patient's electronic medical record that is presently viewable; or(iv) sent by facsimile.(d) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to:(1) Require an entity to provide a patient or patient's designee the notice under subsection (a) if the results are provided to the patient or patient's designee by the health care practitioner or the entity at the time of the test.(2) Prohibit an entity from providing a patient with:(i) The summary of a prostate-specific antigen test.20260HB2592PN3501 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The complete results of the prostate-specific antigen test provided to the ordering health care practitioner.Section 3. Section 4 of the act is amended to read:Section 4. Duties of [Department of Health] department.(a) Compliance.--The [Department of Health] department shall:(1) in accordance with law, conduct compliance reviews as part of the inspection performed by the department or an accrediting organization and investigate complaints filed relating to the requirements of section 3; and(2) establish a complaint procedure, which shall be made available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) List.--The department shall:(1) establish and maintain a list of age ranges with corresponding appropriate and abnormal prostate-specific antigen levels based on available scientific data for use by an entity performing prostate-specific antigen testing;(2) update the list as needed; and(3) publish the list on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2592PN3501 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223